Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2609
Bond issuance; conditions.

Any municipality may by ordinance issue bonds in one or more series for the construction or acquisition of an infrastructure project or any portion thereof and pay the principal of and interest on any such bonds by pledging funds received from the fund. Such bonds shall have a final maturity not later than August 1, 2009, and the aggregate debt service payments and related expenses with respect to all series of such bonds for any twelve-month period during which such bonds are outstanding shall not exceed the anticipated receipts from the fund by such municipality. For purposes of this section, anticipated receipts means the amount received by the municipality from the fund for the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of issuance of such bonds.

Any municipality which has or may issue bonds under this section may dedicate a portion of its property tax levy authority as provided in section 77-3442 to meet debt service obligations under the bonds, but only to the extent the receipts from the fund pledged to the payment of such bonds and any other money made available and used for that purpose are insufficient to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds as they mature.

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 12.